Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 4. Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund.
§ 10.1-2131.
Point source pollution funding; conditions for approval.

The Department of Environmental Quality (the Department) shall be the lead state agency for determining the appropriateness of any grant related to point source pollution to be made from the Fund to restore, protect, or improve state water quality.

The Director of the Department (the Director) shall, subject to available funds and in coordination with the Director of the Department of Conservation and Recreation, direct the State Treasurer to make Water Quality Improvement Grants in accordance with the guidelines established pursuant to §

10.1-2129

. The Director shall enter into grant agreements with all facilities designated as significant dischargers or eligible nonsignificant dischargers that apply for grants; however, all such grant agreements shall contain provisions that payments thereunder are subject to the availability of funds.

Notwithstanding the priority provisions of §

10.1-2129

, the Director shall not authorize the distribution of grants from the Fund for purposes other than financing the cost of design and installation of nutrient removal technology at publicly owned treatment works in the Chesapeake Bay watershed until such time as nutrient reductions of regulations, permits, or the Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan are satisfied, unless he finds that there exists in the Fund sufficient funds for substantial and continuing progress in implementation of the reductions established in accordance with regulations, permits, or the Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan within the Chesapeake Bay watershed.In addition to the provisions of §

10.1-2130

, all grant agreements related to nutrients shall include: (i) numerical technology-based effluent concentration limitations on nutrient discharges to state waters based upon the technology installed by the facility; (ii) enforceable provisions related to the maintenance of the numerical concentrations that will allow for exceedances of 0.8 mg/L for total nitrogen or no more than 10 percent, whichever is greater, for exceedances of 0.1 mg/L for total phosphorus or no more than 10%, and for exceedances caused by extraordinary conditions; and (iii) recognition of the authority of the Commonwealth to make the Virginia Water Facilities Revolving Fund (§ 62.1-224 et seq.) available to local governments to fund their share of the cost of designing and installing nutrient removal technology based on financial need and subject to availability of revolving loan funds, priority ranking, and revolving loan distribution criteria.If, pursuant to §

10.1-1187.6

, the State Water Control Board approves an alternative compliance method to technology-based concentration limitations in Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permits, the concentration limitations of the grant agreement shall be suspended subject to the terms of such approval. The cost of the design and installation of nutrient removal technology at publicly owned treatment works meeting the nutrient reductions of regulations, permits, or the Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan and incurred prior to the execution of a grant agreement is eligible for reimbursement from the Fund if the grant is made pursuant to an executed agreement consistent with the provisions of this chapter.Subsequent to the implementation of any applicable regulations, permits, or the Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan, the Director may authorize disbursements from the Fund for any water quality restoration, protection, and improvements related to point source pollution that are clearly demonstrated as likely to achieve measurable and specific water quality improvements, including cost effective technologies to reduce loads of total phosphorus, total nitrogen, or nitrogen-containing ammonia in order to meet the requirements of regulations associated with the reduction of ammonia that have not yet been adopted and that are more stringent than regulations adopted by the State Water Control Board as of January 1, 2018. Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection, the Director may, at any time, authorize grants, including grants to institutions of higher education, for technical assistance related to nutrient reduction.Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the Director may at any time authorize grants for the design and installation of wastewater conveyance infrastructure that (a) diverts wastewater from one publicly owned treatment works that is eligible for grant funding under this chapter to another publicly owned treatment works that also is eligible for such funding; (b) diverts wastewater to a receiving treatment works that is capable of achieving compliance with its nutrient reduction or ammonia control discharge requirements and results in a net reduction in total phosphorus, total nitrogen, or nitrogen-containing ammonia discharges; and (c) results in a Water Quality Improvement Grant expense being incurred by the Department that is the same as or lower than the grant expense the Department would incur in funding design and installation of eligible nutrient removal or other applicable treatment technology at such treatment works that would have treated the wastewater in the absence of the diversion project.

The grant percentage provided for financing the costs of the design and installation of nutrient removal technology at publicly owned treatment works shall be based upon the financial need of the community as determined by comparing the annual sewer charges expended within the service area to the reasonable sewer cost established for the community.

Grants shall be awarded in the following manner:

In communities for which the ratio of annual sewer charges to reasonable sewer cost is less than 0.30, the Director shall authorize grants in the amount of 35 percent of the costs of the design and installation of nutrient removal technology;

In communities for which the ratio of annual sewer charges to reasonable sewer cost is equal to or greater than 0.30 and less than 0.50, the Director shall authorize grants in the amount of 45 percent of the costs of the design and installation of nutrient removal technology;

In communities for which the ratio of annual sewer charges to reasonable sewer cost is equal to or greater than 0.50 and less than 0.80, the Director shall authorize grants in the amount of 60 percent of the costs of design and installation of nutrient removal technology; and

In communities for which the ratio of annual sewer charges to reasonable sewer cost is equal to or greater than 0.80, the Director shall authorize grants in the amount of 75 percent of the costs of the design and installation of nutrient removal technology.

History.

1997, cc. 21, 625, 626; 1999, cc. 257, 509; 2005, cc. 704, 707, 709; 2006, c. 236; 2015, c. 164; 2018, cc. 609, 610; 2019, c. 533.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 704, 707, and 709, cl. 2 provides: “That the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations, the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Finance, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources and the Senate Committee on Finance, in consultation with the Secretary of Natural Resources and the Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry shall by November 30, 2005, develop recommendations for a permanent source of funding that will sufficiently and predictably generate the necessary revenue to fund the tributary strategy plans to remove the Chesapeake Bay and its tidal tributaries from the Clean Water Act section 303(d) list of impaired waters and to remove those waters located outside the Chesapeake Bay watershed from the impaired waters list.”

Acts 2018, cc. 609 and 610, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Environmental Quality shall prepare a preliminary estimate of the amount and timing of Water Quality Improvement Grants required to fund projects to reduce loads of nitrogen-containing ammonia at the levels authorized by subsection E of §

10.1-2131

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, based on an estimate of the anticipated range of costs for all publicly owned treatment works if the State Water Control Board were to adopt the 2013 Aquatic Life Ambient Water Quality Criteria for Ammonia published by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. For purposes of preparing the preliminary estimate, the Department may rely upon readily available existing information and any reasonable assumption. The Department shall report such preliminary estimate and related assumptions no later than November 1, 2018, to the Chairmen of the Senate Finance Committee, the House Appropriations Committee, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources.”

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 257, effective March 18, 1999, inserted “including grants to institutions of higher education” in the last sentence of subsection C.

The 1999 amendment by c. 509 added “The Director shall manage the allocation of grants from the Fund to ensure the full funding of executed grant agreements” at the end of subsection B, and in subsection C, deleted “in no event shall” following “§

10.1-2129

,” inserted “shall not” following “Environmental Quality,” and substituted “unless he finds that there exists in the Fund sufficient funds for substantial and continuing progress in implementation of the tributary plans” for “The Director shall manage the allocation of grants from the Fund to ensure the full funding of executed grant agreements.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 704, 707, and 709 are identical, and rewrote subsection B; in subsection C, deleted “at least fifty percent of” preceding “the cost of design,” “required by §§ 2.2-218 through 2.2-220” preceding “are developed and implemented,” and “At least fifty percent of” at the beginning of the third sentence; substituted “tributary strategy plan” for “tributary plans” throughout; added subsections D and E; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 236 inserted “or eligible nonsignificant dischargers” in the second sentence of subsection B; deleted “biological nutrient removal facilities or other” preceding “nutrient removal technology” throughout subsections C and E; in subsection C, in clause (i), substituted “technology-based effluent concentration limitations” for “concentrations” and “based upon the technology installed by the facility” for “designed to achieve the nutrient reduction goals of the applicable tributary strategy plan,” in clause (ii), inserted “0.8 mg/L for total nitrogen or” and “whichever is greater, for exceedences of 0.1 mg/L for total phosphorus or no more than 10%,” inserted the third sentence, and in fourth sentence, inserted “or an applicable regulatory requirement”; and deleted “biological nutrient removal facilities and other” in subsection D.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 164 in subsection C, in the first sentence, inserted “in the Chesapeake Bay Watershed,” substituted “nutrient reductions of regulations, permits, or the Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan are satisfied” for “all tributary strategy plans are developed and implemented” and “reductions established in accordance with regulations, permits, or the Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan within the Chesapeake Bay watershed” for “tributary strategy plans” and in the last sentence, substituted “reductions of regulations, permits, or the Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan” for “goal in an applicable tributary strategy plan or an applicable regulatory requirement” and substituted “any applicable regulations, permits, or the Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan” for “the tributary strategy plans” in the second paragraph.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 609 and 610 are identical, and substituted “cost effective technologies to reduce loads of total phosphorus, total nitrogen, or nitrogen-containing ammonia in order to meet the requirements of regulations associated with the reduction of ammonia that have not yet been adopted and that are more stringent than regulations adopted by the State Water Control Board as of January 1, 2018” for “but not limited to, cost effective technologies to reduce nutrient loads” in the second paragraph of subsection C.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 533 deleted “of the Department of Environmental Quality” following “the Director” three times; in subsection A, inserted “(the Department)”; in subsection B, substituted “(the Director)” for “of Environmental Quality”; added the fifth paragraph to subsection C; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Environmental Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 383 (2007).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Technical assistance grant related to nutrient reduction. —

Subsection C of this section does not authorize the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality to issue a technical assistance grant related to nutrient reduction without the notice and the public review and comment period required by §

10.1-2130

.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Christopher K. Peace,
Member, House of Delegates, 08-077, 2008 Va. AG LEXIS 45 (12/11/08).

§ 10.1-2132.
Nonpoint source pollution funding; conditions for approval.

The Department of Conservation and Recreation shall be the lead state agency for determining the appropriateness of any grant related to nonpoint source pollution to be made from the Fund to restore, protect and improve the quality of state waters.

The Director of the Department of Conservation and Recreation shall, subject to available funds and in coordination with the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality, direct the State Treasurer to make Water Quality Improvement Grants in accordance with the guidelines established pursuant to §

10.1-2129

. The Director shall manage the allocation of grants from the Fund to ensure the full funding of executed grant agreements.

Grant funding may be made available to local governments, soil and water conservation districts, institutions of higher education and individuals who propose specific initiatives that are clearly demonstrated as likely to achieve reductions in nonpoint source pollution, including, but not limited to, excess nutrients and suspended solids, to improve the quality of state waters. Such projects may include, but are in no way limited to, the acquisition of conservation easements related to the protection of water quality and stream buffers; conservation planning and design assistance to develop nutrient management plans for agricultural operations; instructional education directly associated with the implementation or maintenance of a specific nonpoint source pollution reduction initiative; the replacement or modification of residential onsite sewage systems to include nitrogen removal capabilities; implementation of cost-effective nutrient reduction practices; and reimbursement to local governments for tax credits and other kinds of authorized local tax relief that provides incentives for water quality improvement. The Director shall give priority consideration to the distribution of grants from the Fund for the purposes of implementing any applicable regulations, permits, or the Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan, with a priority given to agricultural practices. In no single year shall more than 60 percent of the moneys be used for projects or practices exclusively within the Chesapeake Bay watershed.

The Director of the Department of Conservation and Recreation shall manage the allocation of Water Quality Improvement Grants from the Virginia Natural Resources Commitment Fund established under §

10.1-2128.1

.

History.

1997, cc. 21, 625, 626; 1999, cc. 257, 509, 549; 2005, cc. 704, 707, 709; 2008, cc. 643, 701; 2009, c. 695; 2015, c. 164.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 704, 707, and 709, cl. 2 provides: “That the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations, the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Finance, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources and the Senate Committee on Finance, in consultation with the Secretary of Natural Resources and the Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry shall by November 30, 2005, develop recommendations for a permanent source of funding that will sufficiently and predictably generate the necessary revenue to fund the tributary strategy plans to remove the Chesapeake Bay and its tidal tributaries from the Clean Water Act section 303(d) list of impaired waters and to remove those waters located outside the Chesapeake Bay watershed from the impaired waters list.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 373 D, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “It is the intent of the General Assembly, that notwithstanding the provisions of §

10.1-2132

, Code of Virginia, the department is authorized to make Water Quality Improvement Grants to state agencies.”

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 257, effective March 18, 1999, inserted “institutions of higher education” in the first sentence of subsection C.

The 1999 amendment by c. 509 inserted “instructional education directly associated with the implementation or maintenance of a specific nonpoint source pollution reduction initiative” in the second sentence of subsection C.

The 1999 amendment by c. 549 substituted “but not limited to, excess nutrients and suspended solids” for “excess nutrients” in the first sentence of subsection C.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 704, 707, and 709 are identical, and rewrote the last sentence in subsection C.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 643 and 701 are nearly identical, and added subsection D. In addition, c. 643 inserted “of the Department” near the beginning of subsection D.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 695 inserted “the replacement or modification of residential onsite sewage systems to include nitrogen removal capabilities” in the second sentence of subsection C.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 164 substituted “any applicable regulations, permits, or the Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan,” for “tributary strategy plans” in the last sentence of subsection C.

§ 10.1-2133.
Annual report by State Comptroller.

The State Comptroller shall, by January 1 of each year, certify to the chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, the total amount of annual general fund revenue collections in excess of the official estimate in the general appropriation act, the total amount of the unrestricted and uncommitted general fund balance whose reappropriation is not required in the general appropriation act at the close of the previous fiscal year and the total amount of funds that are to be directed to the credit of the Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund under this article unless otherwise provided in the general appropriation act.

History.

1997, cc. 21, 625, 626; 2010, c. 684.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance”. March 10, 2021.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 684 substituted “unrestricted and uncommitted” for “unreserved.”

§ 10.1-2134.
Annual report by Directors of the Departments of Environmental Quality and Conservation and Recreation.

The Directors of the Departments of Environmental Quality and Conservation and Recreation shall, by January 1 of each year, report to the Governor and the General Assembly the amounts and recipients of grants made from the Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund and the specific and measurable pollution reduction achievements to state waters anticipated as a result of each grant award, together with the amounts of continued funding required for the coming fiscal year under all fully executed grant agreements. The report shall provide a detailed progress update on the implementation of agricultural best management practices to reduce nitrogen and phosphorous pollution from agricultural lands. This annual report may be incorporated as part of the report required by § 62.1-44.118.

History.

1997, cc. 21, 625, 626; 2007, c. 637; 2008, cc. 643, 701.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 637 added the last sentence.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 643 and 701 are identical, and inserted the second sentence.

§ 10.1-2134.1.
Water Quality Improvement Fund; estimate of requests.

The Department of Environmental Quality (the Department), in consultation with stakeholders, including representatives of the Virginia Association of Municipal Wastewater Agencies, local governments, and conservation organizations, shall annually determine an estimate of the amount of Water Quality Improvement Grant funding expected to be requested by local governments for projects that are related to point source pollution and are eligible for grant funding pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. The Department shall include such estimate in (i) the biennial funding report that is submitted to the Governor pursuant to the provisions of § 2.2-1504 and (ii) the annual progress report on the impaired waters clean-up plan that is submitted to legislative committees pursuant to the provisions of § 62.1-44.118.

History.

2019, c. 533.